Utah statutes.
78B-15-612 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Child as party -- Representation.

(1)  A minor child is a permissible party, but is not a necessary party to a proceeding under this part.

(2)  The tribunal may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent a minor or incapacitated child if the child is a party or the tribunal finds that the interests of the child are not adequately represented.

